District of Columbia statutes.
25-904

Importation permit and tax requirement.

The Board shall not issue an importation permit until the taxes imposed by this chapter have been paid for the alcoholic beverages for which the permit is requested.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 332, ch. 4, §§ 23, 40
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 3
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 1014, 1015, ch. 600, §§ 1, 2
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, 903, ch. 756, §§ 11, 17
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 135, ch. 146, title V, §§ 505, 508
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VIII, §§ 801, 804
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 81, ch. 154, title III, §§ 301, 302(a), 305
July 25, 1958, 72 Stat. 418, Pub. L. 85-558, §§ 1-5
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 87-238, §§ 1-5
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, § 401
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 855, Pub. L. 89-610, title I, § 101(a), (b)
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 175, Pub. L. 91-106, title V, § 501(a)-(c)
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(9), (11), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 25(b), (c), 32 DCR 30
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 7(a), (b), 36 DCR 4160
May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-119,§ 2, 37 DCR 1738
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(d), 38 DCR 4974
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-904.
1973 Ed., §§ 25-124, 25-138.